Utah statutes.
7-22-102.   Authorization required.

Without prior authorization by the department, no person may perform escrow services, offer to perform escrow services, advertise that it performs escrow services, use the word "escrow" in a business name, or do any other thing that might reasonably cause anyone to believe that the person performs escrow services.

